Utah statutes.
63G-6-809.   Decisions to be in writing.
The Procurement Appeals Board shall issue a decision in writing or take other
appropriate action of each appeal submitted.  A copy of any decision shall be
provided to all parties and the chief procurement officer or the head of a
purchasing agency.
